North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-16 School of Forestry

15-16-01.
School of forestry — Location.

The school of forestry must be located at Dakota college, Bottineau, North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 129, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 1020g; R.C. 1905, § 1231; S.L. 1907, ch. 100, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1674; R.C. 1943, § 15-1601; 2009, ch. 155, § 2.

Cross-References.

State board of higher education to control and administer school of forestry, see N.D.C.C. §

15-10-01.

State forester, see

N.D.C.C. §

4-19-01.

15-16-02.
Object and courses of study. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.